Wisconsin, session 2025, AB499.
do enact as follows:AB499,11Section 1. 49.45 (49m) (e) of the statutes is created to read:AB499,2,7249.45 (49m) (e) In maintaining the list under par. (c) 1., the department may 3not disadvantage or discourage the inclusion on the list of a nonopioid drug that is 4approved by the federal food and drug administration for the treatment or 5management of pain relative to an opioid or narcotic drug for the treatment or 6management of pain. For purposes of this paragraph, prohibited actions include all 7of the following:AB499,2,1081. Designating a nonopioid drug for the treatment or management of pain as 9a nonpreferred drug if any opioid or narcotic drug for the treatment or management 10of pain is listed.AB499,2,15112. Establishing utilization controls, including prior authorization or step 12therapy requirements, that are more restrictive or extensive for a nonopioid drug 13for the treatment or management of pain than the least restrictive or extensive 14utilization controls applicable to an opioid or narcotic drug for the treatment or 15management of pain.AB499,216Section 2. 632.854 of the statutes is created to read:AB499,2,1717632.854 Pain management access plan and coverage. (1) Definitions.AB499,2,1818(a) “Health care plan” has the meaning given in s. 628.36 (2) (a) 1.AB499,3,219(b) “Pain management alternatives” means nonopioid medicinal drugs and 1drug products for the treatment or management of pain and nonpharmacological 2pain management treatment modalities.AB499,3,33(c) “Self-insured health plan” has the meaning given in s. 632.85 (1) (c).AB499,3,94(2) Requirements. A health care plan or self-insured health plan that 5provides coverage for prescription drugs shall develop and implement a pain 6management access plan to provide adequate coverage and access to a broad 7spectrum of pain management alternatives. Under the pain management access 8plan, the health care plan or self-insured health plan shall meet all of the following 9requirements:AB499,3,1310(a) Provide coverage for at least 2 alternative prescription medication 11treatment options that are approved by the federal food and drug administration for 12the treatment or management of pain and that are not controlled substances 13included in schedule I, II, or III under ch. 961.AB499,3,1514(b) Provide coverage for at least 3 alternative nonpharmacological pain 15management treatment modalities.AB499,3,2116(c) Not require a utilization control, including a prior authorization or step 17therapy requirement, for a clinically appropriate nonopioid medicinal drug or drug 18product approved by the federal food and drug administration for the treatment or 19management of pain that is more restrictive or extensive than the least restrictive 20or extensive utilization control applicable to an opioid or narcotic drug approved for 21the treatment or management of pain.AB499,4,222(3) Distribution of pain management information. A health care plan or 23self-insured health plan that is required to develop and implement a pain 24management access plan under sub. (2) shall annually distribute information about 1the pain management access plan to enrollees and health care providers and shall 2make the pain management access plan publicly available on its website.AB499,33Section 3. Initial applicability.AB499,4,64(1) For policies and plans containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this 5act first applies to policy or plan years beginning on January 1 of the year following 6the year in which this subsection takes effect, except as provided in sub. (2).AB499,4,117(2) For policies and plans that are affected by a collective bargaining 8agreement containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this act first applies to 9policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this subsection or on the day 10on which the collective bargaining agreement is newly established, extended, 11modified, or renewed, whichever is later.AB499,412Section 4. Effective date.AB499,4,1413(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after 14publication.AB499,4,1515